New Jersey, session 222, A1728.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 11. Section 1 of P.L.1996, c.93 (C.18A:11-7) is amended to read as follows: 1.  The Legislature finds and declares that many educators believe that school dress can significantly influence pupil behavior and that schools that have adopted dress codes, including dress codes which require school uniforms and which prohibit clothing indicating membership in certain gangs, experience greater school pride and improved behavior in and out of the classroom.  The Legislature further finds that to assist in controlling the environment in public schools, to facilitate and maintain an effective learning environment, and to keep the focus of the classroom on learning, [school districts] public schools should be specifically authorized to implement uniform clothing requirements for their students.1 (cf: P.L.1996, c.93, s.1) 1[1.] 2.1     Section 2 of P.L.1996, c.93 (C.18A:11-8) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  A board of education 1of a school district or a board of trustees of a charter school or renaissance school project1 may adopt a dress code policy to require that students wear a school uniform if the policy is requested by the principal, staff, and parents of an individual school, and if the board determines that the policy will enhance the school learning environment.  Any policy adopted which requires the wearing of a uniform shall include a provision to assist economically disadvantaged students. The board shall hold a public hearing prior to the adoption of the policy and shall not implement the policy with less than three months' notice to the parents or guardians of the students.  The specific uniform selected shall be determined by the principal, staff, and parents of the individual school. b.    The board of education 1or board of trustees1 may provide a method whereby parents may choose not to comply with an adopted school uniform policy.  If the board provides a method, a student shall not be penalized academically or otherwise discriminated against [nor denied admittance to school] if the student's parents choose not to comply with the school uniform policy. c.     A dress code policy adopted pursuant to this section shall not preclude students who participate in a nationally recognized youth organization which is approved by the board of education 1or board of trustees1 from wearing organization uniforms to school on days that the organization has scheduled a meeting. (cf: P.L.1996, c.93, s.2) 13. Section 3 of P.L.1996, c.93 (C.18A:11-9) is amended to read as follows: 3.  A board of education of a school district or board of trustees of a charter school or renaissance school project may adopt a dress code policy to prohibit students from wearing, while on school property, any type of clothing, apparel or accessory which indicates that the student has membership in, or affiliation with, any gang associated with criminal activities.  The local law enforcement agency shall advise the board, upon its request, of gangs which are associated with criminal activities.1 (cf: P.L.1996, c.93, s.3) 1[2.] 4.1     (New section)  a. A student shall not be denied admittance to school due to: (1) tardiness; or (2)   a violation of a school uniform policy or dress code policy, except as may be provided pursuant to a dress code policy adopted pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1996, c.93 (C.18A:11-9). b.    Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the ability to enforce any board of education 1or board of trustees1 adopted student code of conduct or policy that is outside the purview of this section. 1[3.] 5.1     This act shall take effect immediately.